Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Alaska Housing Finance Corporation.
Sec. 18.56.098.
Special mortgage loan purchase program.

The corporation shall establish a special mortgage loan purchase program. Under the special mortgage loan purchase program, the corporation may purchase first or second mortgage loans. A first or second mortgage loan purchased under this subsection must be made for the purchase, improvement, or rehabilitation of a residence or must be a refinancing loan. First or second mortgage loans purchased under this subsection may include graduated payment mortgage loans and adjustable rate mortgage loans.

The corporation shall adopt regulations under AS

18.56.088

to establish minimum construction standards that a residence must meet before the corporation may purchase a mortgage loan on the residence under (a) of this section. The minimum construction standards must include standard deviations from the minimum construction standards to allow the corporation to purchase loans on residences that do not meet the minimum construction standards but that are certified by an engineer to be within the standard deviations. The standard deviations must include, but are not limited to, provisions relating to water holding tanks, on-site water and sewer systems, and foundations.

The corporation may pledge mortgage loans purchased by the corporation under (a) of this section, mortgage loans assigned to the corporation for the special mortgage loan purchase program, and mortgage loans purchased with amounts appropriated to the corporation for the special mortgage loan purchase program to pay the principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, on bonds or bond anticipation notes issued by the corporation for the special mortgage loan purchase program and may expend amounts appropriated to the special mortgage loan purchase program for mortgage loan subsidies or other purposes of the program as necessary to cause the interest rate on mortgage loans purchased under the special mortgage loan purchase program and retained by the corporation or sold under AS

18.56.099

to equal the rates specified in this section.

[Repealed, § 51 ch 115 SLA 1981.]

The corporation shall adopt regulations under AS

18.56.088

to implement the special mortgage loan purchase program. The regulations shall include provisions allowing, prohibiting, or restricting the right to assume or the right to provide for the payment of mortgage loans purchased under (a) of this section by a person other than the mortgagor. A provision in a mortgage loan purchased by the corporation after June 30, 1981, that prohibits or restricts the right to assume or the right to provide for the payment of mortgage loans is enforceable. The corporation shall enforce the regulations adopted under this subsection.

The corporation shall establish the interest rate on a first mortgage loan purchased under (a) of this section in accordance with the following:

the interest rate on the loan amount eligible for assistance of a mortgage loan purchased with the proceeds of an issue of taxable bonds of the corporation is three percent less than the cost of funds of that issue, except that

if the cost of funds of that issue is less than 10 percent, the interest rate is equal to the cost of funds; and

if the cost of funds of that issue is more than 10 percent, the interest rate may not be less than 10 percent;

an interest rate determined under this subsection on the loan amount eligible for assistance of a mortgage loan that is not purchased from the proceeds of bonds that are qualified veterans’ mortgage bonds under the applicable provisions of 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code) shall be reduced by one percentage point if the loan is made to an eligible veteran under AS

18.56.101

;

the interest rate for the amount of a mortgage loan purchased under (a) of this section that exceeds the loan amount eligible for assistance is equal to the cost of funds to the corporation attributable to that part of the loan;

the interest rate on the loan amount eligible for assistance of a mortgage loan purchased with money that is not the proceeds of either taxable or tax-exempt bonds is the rate the corporation determines is appropriate by application of the provision of (1) of this subsection;

the interest rate on the loan amount eligible for assistance of a mortgage loan purchased from the proceeds of bonds that are exempt from taxation, other than bonds that constitute qualified veterans’ bonds under (h) of this section, is equal to the interest rate determined under (1) and (2) of this subsection on a loan purchased under (a) of this section from the proceeds of the most recent applicable issue of taxable bonds sold by the corporation; a higher or lower interest rate shall be established on the entire loan amount if required to ensure the tax-exempt status of the bonds;

the corporation shall determine the interest rate on a mortgage loan that is an adjustable rate mortgage loan as provided in this subsection; the corporation shall recalculate the interest rate from time to time based on changes in the cost to the corporation of the funds used to purchase the adjustable rate mortgage loan; however, the corporation may establish a minimum interest rate applicable to an adjustable rate mortgage loan, and the interest rate on the adjustable rate mortgage loan may not be less than the minimum interest rate so established regardless of the cost of funds to the corporation;

for loans made under this section, the corporation shall give effect to interest rate changes applicable to the loans based on time of loan application, time of issuance of the corporation’s bonds issued to purchase loans, or other factors as the corporation determines;

in this subsection,

“cost of funds” means the true interest cost expressed as a rate on bonds of the corporation plus an additional percentage as determined by the corporation to represent the allocable expenses of operation, costs of issuance, and mortgage servicing;

“taxable bonds” means bonds bearing interest that is taxable under applicable provisions of 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code) and which were issued to finance the purchase of first mortgage loans.

The corporation shall establish the interest rate on a second mortgage loan purchased under (a) of this section in the manner established for computing the interest rates on a first mortgage loan under (f) of this section except that, in the case of a second mortgage loan, if the first mortgage loan made to the same borrower is held by the corporation and was purchased under the special mortgage loan purchase program, the outstanding principal balance of the existing first mortgage loan is subtracted from the loan amount eligible for assistance to determine the amount of the loan that is eligible for an interest rate on a second mortgage loan determined by reference to (f) of this section.

The interest rate on the loan amount eligible for assistance of a mortgage loan purchased from the proceeds of bonds that constitute qualified veterans’ mortgage bonds under applicable provisions of 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code) is the rate for other loans to veterans under (f)(2) of this section. A higher or lower interest rate shall be established on the entire loan amount if required by applicable provisions of 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code).

If the money used to purchase a mortgage loan made to a veteran under this section comes from an issue of bonds of the corporation guaranteed by the state, each bond must be issued as part of an issue substantially all of the proceeds of which are used to provide residences for qualifying veterans. In this subsection, a qualifying veteran is a person who is a “qualified veteran” as the term is defined or may subsequently be defined under 26 U.S.C. 143.

The interest rate limitations of AS

45.45.010

do not apply to loans purchased under this section or to loans that the corporation has, in any manner, committed itself to purchase.

In this section and in AS

18.56.091

and

18.56.099

“graduated payment mortgage loan” means a mortgage loan the terms of which provide for monthly principal and interest payments that

during the first year of the mortgage loan are lower than the monthly principal and interest payments that would be required under the terms of a level payment mortgage loan made at the same interest rate; and

during subsequent years of the mortgage loan are graduated to provide for the same return over the term of the loan that would have been provided by a level payment mortgage loan made at the same interest rate;

“loan amount eligible for assistance” means

the first $50,000 of a mortgage loan for persons of lower or moderate income whose purchase of a home is assisted under AS

18.56.091

; or

except as to persons whose purchase of a home is assisted under AS 18.56.091, the amount of a mortgage loan that does not exceed the amount of the loan established by law; if an amount has not been established by law, the amount is zero;

“mortgage loan” includes a beneficial interest or participation in a mortgage loan;

“residence” means

an owner-occupied, single-family residence, including a mobile home; or

an owner-occupied duplex, triplex, or fourplex.

History.

(§ 27 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 4 — 7, 51 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1982; am §§ 19 — 24 ch 113 SLA 1982; am §§ 7, 8, 27 ch 102 SLA 1983; am § 5 ch 128 SLA 1984; am §§ 1, 2 ch 9 SLA 1986; am §§ 3, 4 ch 41 SLA 1987; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 30 SLA 1990; am § 74 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (k) was formerly (f). Relettered in 1994, at which time subsections (g) — (k) were relettered as (f) — (j), respectively. Paragraph (f)(6) was enacted as (g)(7) and renumbered as (g)(6) in 1987, at which time former (g)(6) was renumbered as (g)(7) (now (f)(7)).

Administrative Code. —

For special mortgage loan program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 1.

For qualified mortgage bonds, see 15 AAC 151, art. 2.

For veterans’ mortgage program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 3.

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

Sec. 18.56.099.
Powers of corporation to deal in mortgage loans.

The corporation may purchase, sell, hold, or otherwise deal in mortgage loans.
In connection with the purchase or sale of a beneficial interest or participation in a mortgage loan, the corporation may enter into a trust agreement providing for the custody, control, and administration of the mortgage loan. The trust agreement may provide that the corporation or a bank or trust company shall act as trustor or trustee under the trust and that title to the mortgage loans subject to the trust shall be considered to have passed as provided in the trust agreement.
To the extent provided in the trust agreement, the effect of a sale of a beneficial interest or participation in a mortgage loan is the same as the sale of the mortgage loan subject to the trust.

History.

(§ 27 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For definition of “mortgage loan” applicable to this section, see AS

18.56.098(k)

.

Administrative Code. —

For qualified mortgage bonds, see 15 AAC 151, art. 2.

For senior housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 5.

For multi-family, special needs, and congregate housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 6.

Sec. 18.56.100.
Housing development fund.

There is created a housing development fund to be administered by the corporation as a trust fund separate and distinct from any other money or funds administered by the corporation.

Consistent with AS

18.56.090

, the corporation may make temporary and permanent loans from the housing development fund, at an interest rate or rates determined by the corporation, and with the security for repayment that is necessary and practicable, to purchase, make, or participate in the making of mortgage loans

to borrowers who are sponsors, nonprofit corporations, or agencies of the state or a municipal government, for permanent loans to develop, build, repair, remodel, or rehabilitate residential housing that is to be used and occupied as congregate housing; or

that are not federally insured or guaranteed for residential housing, if the corporation determines that the loans are not otherwise available, wholly or in part, from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions.

To the credit of the housing development fund shall be deposited

grants and contributions to the fund; and

all receipts of the corporation on account of repayment of or sale or other disposition of the security for any loans made under (b) of this section.

The corporation may receive and accept from any source whatever any grants or contributions for the housing development fund.

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

The corporation may reduce the interest rate on a loan entered into under (b)(1) of this section only from amounts appropriated to the housing development fund specifically to reduce the interest payable by borrowers who develop housing under (b)(1) of this section. If a project developed by a borrower with a reduced interest subsidy made under this subsection ceases to be used for congregate housing, the corporation shall adjust the interest rate payable on the unpaid balance of the loan to the prevailing rate of interest charged by the corporation on loans made for other residential purposes, but may not reduce the interest rate payable below the subsidized rate.

The corporation shall adopt regulations to implement (b)(1) and (l) of this section that

determine borrower eligibility, including regulations to determine that the borrower has the ability to repay the loan;

define procedures for the application, review, and approval of authorized loans;

establish loan guidelines, loan terms, and acceptable security for loans; and

identify characteristics of housing projects eligible for loans.

In (b)(1) and (l) of this section, “congregate housing” means a multi-family housing development with fully independent living units and services integrated in the buildings that may include, but are not limited to, housekeeping, meal service, and resident training or development programs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 81 SLA 1972; am § 28 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 25 — 27, 72 ch 113 SLA 1982; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 132 SLA 1990; am § 94 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.101.
Eligibility for veterans’ interest rates.

The following persons are eligible veterans for the purposes of AS

18.56.098(f)

and (g):

a person who served in the armed forces of the United States for 90 days or more, or whose service was for less than 90 days because of injury or disability incurred in the line of duty, after April 6, 1917, whose discharge was under honorable conditions;

the widow or widower of a member of the armed forces or an eligible veteran if the member or veteran served in the armed forces for at least 90 days after April 6, 1917, and the veteran’s discharge was under honorable conditions;

a person who has served for not less than five years in the Alaska Army National Guard, or the Alaska Air National Guard, or a reserve unit of the United States armed forces if the reserve unit required, as a minimum, one weekend each month of duty and 15 consecutive days of active duty training each year and

whose discharge was under honorable conditions; or

who is currently in an active status in the guard or a reserve unit;

a person who has served as a commissioned officer of the Regular or Reserve Corps of the Public Health Service whose discharge was under honorable conditions;

a person who served in the Alaska Territorial Guard for 90 days or more or whose service was for less than 90 days because of injury or disability incurred in the line of duty;

the widow or widower of a person who served at least 90 days in the Alaska Territorial Guard.

History.

(§ 29 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 12 ch 67 SLA 1983; am § 9 ch 102 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 93 SLA 1991)

Sec. 18.56.102.
Simplified refinancing mortgage loan purchase program. [Repealed, § 9 ch 41 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 18.56.108.]

Sec. 18.56.103.
Federal taxation of interest on bonds and bond anticipation notes.

If the interest on bonds or bond anticipation notes of the corporation issued after June 1, 1980, becomes taxable under the income tax laws of the United States, the legislature may appropriate an amount sufficient to pay the outstanding principal and interest on the bonds or bond anticipation notes. Nothing in this section creates a debt or liability of the state.

History.

(§ 29 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Sec. 18.56.104.
Allocation of tax-exempt bonds. [Repealed, § 2 ch 81 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 18.56.105.
Allocation of lending activities.

The corporation shall designate regions within the state that, in the aggregate, encompass the entire state. In participating in the making or purchasing of loans under AS

18.56.090(a)(1)

and (2) or under AS

18.56.100

, the corporation shall make its money available through the private financial institutions in the state within each region designated by the corporation under this section. The corporation shall allocate its money among the regions on the basis of recent and future anticipated lending activity as well as the potential need for the loans in each region and may reallocate its money among the regions as it considers appropriate to reflect changes in lending activity or need in the regions.

History.

(§ 29 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 33 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 132 SLA 1990)

Sec. 18.56.106.
Nonconforming housing loan program.

There is established in the corporation the nonconforming housing loan program to assist persons to purchase housing that does not conform to minimum building standards under any state or federal program that provides for housing purchases.

The corporation shall adopt regulations under this section that establish conditions and terms for nonconforming housing loans including terms and conditions relating to owner and nonowner occupancy, the number of loans that may be made to a single borrower, and borrower eligibility requirements. The corporation shall permit loans under this section for nonconforming housing located on land to which a borrower has agricultural rights.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 41 SLA 1987)

Sec. 18.56.107.
Loan origination and service fees for rural areas.

Loan origination and service fees charged for a loan made or purchased in a rural area with money received by the corporation after July 1, 1981, may be higher than loan origination and service fees charged for other loans made or purchased by the corporation and the corporation may pay a portion of the higher fees.

History.

(§ 10 ch 115 SLA 1981)

Sec. 18.56.108.
Simplified refinancing mortgage loan purchase program.

The corporation shall establish a simplified refinancing mortgage loan purchase program. Under the simplified refinancing mortgage loan purchase program, the corporation may purchase refinancing mortgage loans to provide relief to borrowers under circumstances described by regulations adopted by the corporation.

AS

18.56.098(c)

, (e), and (j) apply to refinancing mortgage loans purchased under (a) of this section.

Subject to (d) of this section, the interest rate on a refinancing mortgage loan purchased under (a) of this section is two percent less than the cost to the corporation of the money used to purchase the refinancing mortgage loan, except that if the cost of money

is 10 percent or less, the interest rate is equal to the cost of money; and

is more than 10 percent, the interest rate may not be less than 10 percent.

If the refinancing mortgage loan is an adjustable rate mortgage loan, the corporation shall establish the initial interest rate as provided in (c) of this section and shall recalculate the interest rate from time to time in accordance with (c) of this section. However, notwithstanding (c)(1) of this section, the corporation may establish a minimum interest rate applicable to an adjustable rate refinancing mortgage loan. The interest rate on the adjustable rate refinancing mortgage loan may not be less than the minimum interest rate established under this subsection, regardless of the cost of money to the corporation.

The corporation may adopt regulations to implement this section, including regulations to define “cost of money” for purposes of this section. The regulations may provide for recalculation of the cost of money under (d) of this section at the times and frequencies the corporation considers appropriate. The time and frequency for a recalculation under (d) of this section is not required to match the time or frequency of a change in the cost of money to the corporation.

Equity extraction may not be allowed under this program.

In this section, “refinancing mortgage loan” means a loan refinancing another mortgage loan owned by the corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1989)

Sec. 18.56.109.
Teachers’ and health care professionals’ housing loan program. [Repealed, § 2 ch 115 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 18.56.110.
Bonds and notes.

The corporation, by resolution, may issue bonds and bond anticipation notes in order to provide funds to carry out and effectuate its purposes.

The principal and interest on these bonds or notes, except state guaranteed bonds, is payable from corporation funds, excluding funds in the housing development fund. The principal and interest on state guaranteed bonds is payable from corporation funds, excluding funds in the housing development fund, and in accordance with the terms of the state guaranty of principal and interest. Bond anticipation notes may be payable from the proceeds of the sale of bonds or from the proceeds of sale of other bond anticipation notes or, in the event bond or bond anticipation note proceeds are not available, the notes may be paid from other funds or assets of the corporation. Bonds or notes may be additionally secured by a pledge of a grant or contribution from the federal government, or a corporation, association, institution, or person, or a pledge of money, income, or revenues of the corporation from any source. The corporation may issue state guaranteed bond anticipation notes in anticipation of the sale of state guaranteed bonds to be issued under this chapter. State guaranteed bond anticipation notes are guaranteed as to principal and interest by the state and secured by the full faith, credit, and resources of the state.

Bonds or bond anticipation notes may be issued in one or more series and shall be dated, bear interest at the rate or rates per year or within the maximum rate, be in the denomination, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the conversion or registration provisions, have the rank or priority, be executed in the manner and form, be payable from the sources in the medium of payment and place or places within or outside the state, be subject to authentication by a trustee or fiscal agent, and be subject to the terms of redemption with or without premium, as the resolution of the corporation may provide. Bond anticipation notes shall mature at the time or times that are determined by the corporation. Bonds shall mature at a time, not exceeding 50 years from their date, that is determined by the corporation. Before the preparation of definitive bonds or bond anticipation notes, the corporation may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds or bond anticipation notes, with or without coupons, exchangeable for bonds or bond anticipation notes when these definitive bonds or bond anticipation notes have been executed and are available for delivery.

Bonds or bond anticipation notes, except state guaranteed bonds and bond anticipation notes, may be sold in the manner and on the terms the corporation determines. State guaranteed bonds and bond anticipation notes shall be sold at public sale by the corporation in amounts and at times as may be approved by the state bond committee, on terms fixed under the notice of sale.

If an officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or notes or coupons attached to them ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bond, note or coupon, the signature or facsimile is valid the same as if the officer had remained in office until delivery.

In any resolution of the corporation authorizing or relating to the issuance of bonds or bond anticipation notes, the corporation has power by provisions in the resolution which will constitute covenants of the corporation and contracts with the holders of the bonds or bond anticipation notes

to pledge to any payment or purpose all or any part of its revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence, and the money derived from the revenues, and the proceeds of any bonds or notes;

to covenant against pledging all or any part of its revenues, or against permitting or suffering a lien on the revenues of its property;

to covenant as to the use and disposition of any and all payments of principal or interest received by the corporation on mortgage loans, construction loans, or other investments held by the corporation;

to covenant as to establishment of reserves or sinking funds and the making of provision for and the regulation and disposition of the reserves or sinking funds;

to covenant with respect to or against limitations on a right to sell or otherwise dispose of property of any kind;

to covenant as to bonds and notes to be issued, and their limitations, terms, and conditions, and as to the custody, application, and disposition of the proceeds of the bonds and notes;

to covenant as to the issuance of additional bonds or notes, or as to limitations on the issuance of additional bonds or notes and the incurring of other debts;

to covenant as to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds or notes, as to the sources and methods of the payment, as to the rank or priority of the bonds or notes with respect to a lien or security, or as to the acceleration of the maturity of the bonds or notes;

to provide for the replacement of lost, stolen, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or notes;

to covenant against extending the time for the payment of bonds or notes or interest on the bonds or notes;

to covenant as to the redemption of bonds or notes and privileges of their exchange for other bonds or notes of the corporation;

to covenant to create or authorize the creation of special funds of money to be held in pledge or otherwise for operating expenses, payment or redemption of bonds or notes, reserves, or other purposes, and as to the use and disposition of the money held in the funds;

to establish the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract or covenant with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds or notes may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent to amendment or abrogation, and the manner in which the consent may be given;

to covenant as to the custody of any of its properties or investments, their safekeeping and insurance, and the use and disposition of insurance money;

to covenant as to the time or manner of enforcement or restraint from enforcement of any rights of the corporation arising by reason of or with respect to nonpayment of any principal or interest of any mortgage loans or construction loans;

to provide for the rights and liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation, and to prescribe the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all the bonds, notes, or other obligations of the corporation become or may be declared due and payable before maturity and the terms and conditions upon which any such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

to vest in a trustee or trustees within or outside the state the property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the corporation may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers, and duties of any trustee appointed by the holders of any bonds or notes, and to limit or abrogate the right of the holders of any bonds or notes of the corporation to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limit the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee;

to pay the costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the bonds or notes or of the provisions of the resolution or of any covenant or agreement of the corporation with the holders of its bonds or notes;

to agree with any corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside the state as to the pledging or assigning of revenue or funds to which or in which the corporation has any rights or interest; the agreement may further provide for other rights and remedies exercisable by the trustee as may be proper for the protection of the holders of any bonds or notes of the corporation and not otherwise in violation of law and may provide for the restriction of the rights of an individual holder of bonds or notes of the corporation;

to appoint and provide for the duties and obligations of any paying agent or paying agents, or other fiduciaries as the resolution may provide within or outside the state;

to limit the rights of the holders of any bonds or notes to enforce any pledge or covenant securing bonds or notes;

to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants expressly authorized in this section, of like or different character, and to make covenants to do or refrain from doing acts and things as may be necessary, or convenient and desirable, in order to better secure bonds or notes or that, in the absolute discretion of the corporation, will tend to make bonds or notes more marketable, notwithstanding that the covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated in this section.

Notwithstanding AS

18.56.090(a)(11)

and (a) of this section, the corporation may not issue bonds in any 12-month period in an amount that exceeds the amount of bonds authorized to be issued during the preceding period, unless a different amount is authorized by the legislature. This subsection does not apply to

the issuance by the corporation of refunding bonds;

the issuance by the corporation of bonds the proceeds of which are intended to be used to refinance mortgage loans held by the corporation; or

the issuance by a subsidiary of the corporation of bonds to prepay all or a portion of a governmental employer’s share of unfunded accrued actuarial liability of retirement systems if the board of the subsidiary first finds that the actuarially assumed rate of return on the funds managed by the Alaska Retirement Management Board is projected to exceed the true interest cost to be paid on the bonds by at least 1.5 percent annually.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 11 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 1982; am §§ 28, 29 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 41 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 132 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 6 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning state guaranteed veterans residential mortgage bonds, see secs. 5 — 11, ch. 35, SLA 1982, in the 1982 Temporary and Special Acts, secs. 1 — 4, ch. 34, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts, and sections 1 — 4, ch. 46, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.56.115.
Independent financial advisor.

In negotiating the private sale of bonds or bond anticipation notes to an underwriter, the corporation may retain a financial advisor.
A financial advisor retained under this section must be independent from the underwriter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 102 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 130 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 102 SLA 1983)

Sec. 18.56.120.
Validity of any pledge.

The pledge of assets or revenue of the corporation to the payment of the principal or interest on any obligations of the agency is valid and binding from the time the pledge is made and the assets or revenue are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act.
The lien of any pledge is valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the corporation, irrespective of whether those parties have notice of the lien of the pledge.
This section does not prohibit the corporation from selling assets subject to any pledge, except that any sale may be restricted by the trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of the obligations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971)

Sec. 18.56.125.
Capital reserve fund.

For the purpose of securing any one or more issues of its obligations, the corporation may establish one or more special funds, called “capital reserve funds”, and shall pay into those capital reserve funds (1) any money appropriated and made available by the state for the purpose of any of those funds, (2) any proceeds of the sale of its obligations, to the extent provided in the resolution or resolutions of the corporation authorizing their issuance, and (3) any other money that may be made available to the corporation for the purposes of those funds from any other source. All money held in a capital reserve fund, except as provided in this section, shall be used as required, solely for the payment of the principal of obligations or of the sinking fund payments with respect to those obligations; the purchase or redemption of obligations; the payment of interest on obligations; or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when those obligations are redeemed before maturity. However, money in any fund may not be withdrawn from it at any time in an amount that would reduce the amount of that fund to less than the capital reserve requirement set out in (b) of this section, except for the purpose of making, with respect to those obligations, payment, when due, of principal, interest, redemption premiums and the sinking fund payments for the payment of which other money of the corporation is not available. Any income or interest earned by, or increment to, a capital reserve fund, due to the investment of the fund or any other amounts in it, may be transferred by the corporation to other funds or accounts of the corporation to the extent that the transfer does not reduce the amount of the capital reserve fund below the capital reserve fund requirement.

If the corporation decides to issue obligations secured by a capital reserve fund, the obligations may not be issued if the amount in the capital reserve fund is less than such a percent, not exceeding 10 percent of the principal amount of all of those obligations secured by that capital reserve fund then to be issued and then outstanding in accordance with their terms, as may be established by resolution of the corporation (called the “capital reserve fund requirement”), unless the corporation, at the time of issuance of the obligations, deposits in such capital reserve fund from the proceeds of the obligations to be issued or from other sources, an amount which, together with the amount then in the fund, will not be less than the capital reserve fund requirement.

In computing the amount of a capital reserve fund for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of the funds are invested shall be valued at par or, if purchased at less than par, at amortized costs as the term is defined by resolution of the corporation authorizing the issue of the obligations, or by some other reasonable method established by the corporation by resolution. Valuation on a particular date shall include the amount of any interest earned or accrued to that date.

To assure the continued operation and solvency of the corporation for the carrying out of its corporate purposes, provision is made in (a) of this section for the accumulation in capital reserve funds of an amount equal to their capital reserve fund requirement.

The chairman of the corporation shall annually, no later than January 2, make and deliver to the governor and chairmen of the house and senate finance committees a certificate stating the sum, if any, required to restore any capital reserve fund to the capital reserve fund requirement. The legislature may appropriate that sum, and all sums appropriated during the then current fiscal year by the legislature for the restoration shall be deposited by the corporation in the proper capital reserve fund. Nothing in this section creates a debt or liability of the state.

[Repealed by § 77 ch 106 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 9 ch 151 SLA 1975; am § 77 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Sec. 18.56.130.
Remedies.

A holder of obligations or coupons attached to them issued under the provisions of this chapter, and a trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of the obligations, except as restricted by a trust agreement or resolution, either at law or in equity, may enforce all rights granted hereunder or under the trust agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the corporation under this chapter, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by the trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the corporation or by any officer of it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971)

Sec. 18.56.135.
Loan servicing requirements.

If the servicing of a loan is sold to another person, the seller shall notify the mortgagor of the sale within 10 days after the actual date of the sale. The notification must include

the name, address, and telephone number of the person who will assume responsibility for the servicing and accept payments for the loan;

a detailed written financial breakdown of the loan, including the interest rate, monthly payment amount, and current escrow balance.

The purchaser of loan servicing under (a) of this section shall

issue to the mortgagor corrected coupon or payment books, if used;

within 20 days after the due date of the first payment to be made to the purchaser,

notify the mortgagor of the name, address, and telephone number of the person from whom the mortgagor can receive information regarding the servicing of the loan;

inform the mortgagor of changes made regarding the loan escrow account or servicing requirements, including the interest rate, monthly payment amount, and current escrow balance.

A loan servicing agent shall respond within 15 business days to a written request for information from the mortgagor. The written response must include the telephone number of the agent’s representative who can assist the mortgagor.

If a mortgagor of a loan is required to maintain funds in an escrow account to cover the payment of the tax or insurance obligations for the mortgaged property, the loan servicing agent shall make each tax or insurance payment in a timely manner as the obligations become due if the funds in the account are sufficient to cover the payment. If the funds in the account are insufficient to make the payment, the loan servicing agent shall promptly notify the mortgagor of the shortage and may make the payment on behalf of the mortgagor.

In this section,

“loan” means a mortgage loan purchased by the corporation under a residential housing loan program authorized by this chapter;

“loan servicing agent” means an institution other than the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation that services a loan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1988)

Sec. 18.56.140.
Negotiable instruments.

All obligations and interest coupons attached to them are negotiable instruments under the laws of this state, subject only to any applicable provisions for registration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971)